Maryland, session 2025, SB0377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0377*

SENATE BILL 377
(c) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
SUBTITLE 27. BRIDGE PROGRAM.
5–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BRIDGE PROGRAM” MEANS THE BUSINESS RESOURCE INITIATIVE
FOR DEVELOPMENTAL GROWTH AND EMPOWERMENT PROGRAM.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE BUSINESS RESOURCE INITIATIVE FOR
DEVELOPMENTAL GROWTH AND EMPOWERMENT FUND.
(D) “QUALIFIED INCUBATOR” MEANS A FOR–PROFIT ORGANIZATION,
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION, B CORPORATION, PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP, OR
SOCIAL ENTERPRISE IN THE STATE THAT:
(1) PRIMARILY SERVES OR WILL PRIMARILY SERVE BUSINESSES IN
THE STATE;
(2) REQUIRES OR WILL REQUIRE PARTICIPATING BUSINESSES TO
ENGAGE IN A FORMAL INCUBATOR PROGRAM DESIGNED TO ADVANCE EARLY–STAGE
BUSINESSES;
(3) IS STAFFED OR WILL BE STAFFED BY AT LEAST ONE INDIVIDUAL
DEDICATED TO MENTORING BUSINESSES AND GUIDING BUSINESSES THROUGH THE
BRIDGE PROGRAM;
(4) IS DIRECTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS COMPLETED A
TRAINING PROGRAM THAT:
(I) FOCUSED ON OPERATING A BUSINESS INCUBATOR
TARGETING SOCIALLY AND ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED ENTREPRENEURS OR
HELPING SOCIALLY AND ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED ENTREPRENEURS
SECURE INVESTMENT; AND
(II) INCORPORATED TOPICS INCLUDING:
1. DIVERSITY, EQUITY, AND INCLUSION SOLUTIONS;
2. BUILDING WEALTH IN DIVERSE COMMUNITIES;

SENATE BILL 377 3
3. NAVIGATING DIVERSE TECHNOLOGY
ENTREPRENEURSHIP;
4. RISK, LEGAL ISSUES, AND SECURITIES AND
EXCHANGE COMMISSION REGULATIONS;
5. THE DUE DILIGENCE PROCESS FOR EARLY–STAGE
INVESTMENTS;
6. ACCOUNTING, TAXES, AND EXITS FOR COMPANIES
AND FOUNDERS;
7. UNDERSTANDING AND MITIGATING CONSCIOUS AND
UNCONSCIOUS BIAS; AND
8. CORPORATE BOARD GOVERNANCE, HUMAN
RESOURCES, PROCUREMENT, PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT, AND CORPORATE
INNOVATION; AND
(5) WAS ESTABLISHED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2012.
5–2702.
(A) (1) THERE IS A BRIDGE PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE BRIDGE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE
GRANTS TO QUALIFIED INCUBATORS TO ESTABLISH DIVERSE AND EFFECTIVE
BUSINESS INCUBATORS IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE BRIDGE PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HIRE AT LEAST ONE FULL–TIME
COORDINATOR TO ADMINISTER THE BRIDGE PROGRAM.
5–2703.
(A) EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD GRANTS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AWARD A GRANT UNDER THE BRIDGE
PROGRAM FOR:

SENATE BILL 377
(I) PLANNING THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A QUALIFIED
INCUBATOR OR PLANNING FOR A QUALIFIED INCUBATOR’S LONG–TERM
SUSTAINABILITY;
(II) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS, SECURING REAL ESTATE,
RENOVATIONS, AND THE PURCHASE OF CAPITAL EQUIPMENT TO ESTABLISH OR
GROW A QUALIFIED INCUBATOR; OR
(III) OPERATING AND PROGRAM EXPENSES ASSOCIATED WITH
SUPPORTING PROGRAMS.
(2) EXCEPT IN THE FIRST YEAR OF A GRANT, GRANTS AWARDED
UNDER THE BRIDGE PROGRAM MAY NOT BE USED TO SUPPORT MORE THAN 25%
OF THE OPERATING EXPENSES OF A QUALIFIED INCUBATOR.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
GRANTS AWARDED UNDER THE BRIDGE PROGRAM SHALL RENEW AND BE
AWARDED TO A QUALIFIED INCUBATOR EACH FISCAL YEAR WITHOUT FURTHER
APPLICATION.
(II) THE RENEWAL OF A GRANT IS SUBJECT TO THE QUALIFIED
INCUBATOR’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE GRANT INCLUDING ECONOMIC
IMPACT METRICS PROPOSED IN THE APPLICATION FOR THE GRANT AND ON A
COMPETITIVE BASIS WITH OTHER QUALIFIED INCUBATORS APPLYING FOR
FUNDING.
(4) FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR, AN ORGANIZATION MAY NOT RECEIVE A
GRANT UNDER THE BRIDGE PROGRAM THAT IS LESS THAN $100,000 OR EXCEEDS
$400,000.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A COMPETITIVE
APPLICATION PROCESS FOR GRANTS MADE UNDER THE BRIDGE PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD AT LEAST HALF OF THE MONEY
APPROPRIATED TO THE BRIDGE PROGRAM TO ORGANIZATIONS THAT
PARTICIPATE IN PROCUREMENTS UNDER § 14–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND GIVE PREFERENCE TO QUALIFIED INCUBATORS
THAT:
(I) HAVE A PROGRAM MANAGED BY SOCIALLY OR
ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED INDIVIDUALS;
(II) ARE LOCATED IN A FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED HUB ZONE, A
STATE QUALIFIED OPPORTUNITY ZONE, OR AN UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY;

SENATE BILL 377 5
(III) HAVE EXPERIENCE SUPPORTING COMPANIES IN THE
START–UP STAGE;
(IV) SERVE COMPANIES LED BY SOCIALLY OR ECONOMICALLY
DISADVANTAGED INDIVIDUALS AND THAT HAVE AN ECONOMIC IMPACT ON
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES; OR
(V) HAVE ESTABLISHED A PRESENCE IN AN UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITY.
5–2704.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT AND A GRANT RECIPIENT SHALL EXECUTE A
BRIDGE PROGRAM AGREEMENT.
(2) THE GRANT RECIPIENT SHALL COMPLY WITH THE TERMS OF THE
BRIDGE PROGRAM AGREEMENT.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY EXERCISE ANY REMEDY AUTHORIZED BY
LAW IF THE GRANT RECIPIENT:
(I) VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THE BRIDGE PROGRAM
AGREEMENT; OR
(II) DOES NOT MEET A REQUIREMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, AN ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES A GRANT UNDER THE BRIDGE
PROGRAM SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT DOCUMENTING HOW THE
ORGANIZATION USED THE GRANT MONEY RECEIVED IN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) INFORMATION ABOUT THE USE OF THE GRANT;
(II) THE ECONOMIC IMPACT OF THE GRANT; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS
NECESSARY TO DETERMINE THE EFFECTIVENESS AND IMPACT OF THE BRIDGE
PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 377
(3) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR:
(I) THE NUMBER OF GRANTS AWARDED UNDER THE BRIDGE
PROGRAM;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF EACH GRANT AWARDED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(III) THE NAME AND LOCATION OF EACH ORGANIZATION
AWARDED A GRANT UNDER THE BRIDGE PROGRAM.
5–2705.
(A) THERE IS A BUSINESS RESOURCE INITIATIVE FOR DEVELOPMENTAL
GROWTH AND EMPOWERMENT FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FUND GRANTS AWARDED UNDER THE
BRIDGE PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT SUBJECT TO
REVERSION UNDER § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(E) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY, AND THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(2) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO PROVIDE GRANTS UNDER THE BRIDGE
PROGRAM.
(2) UP TO 15% OF THE ANNUAL APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND MAY
BE USED FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE FUND AND THE BRIDGE PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 377 7
(H) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2032, THE GOVERNOR MAY
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 TO THE
FUND.
(I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND IN
THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(J) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(K) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
5–2706.
NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT AN
ORGANIZATION FROM RECEIVING FUNDS FROM A GOVERNMENT SOURCE OTHER
THAN THE BRIDGE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 7 years and, at the end of June 30, 2032,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.